Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-602
Prosecutions; when and where brought; limitation.

Prosecutions shall be brought before a court of competent jurisdiction in the county within which the offense was committed. If the offense charged is that of having sold, having transported, or having in possession game, wild mammals, wild birds, fish, or raw furs in violation of law, prosecutions may be brought in any county through which or into which any such game, wild mammals, wild birds, fish, or raw furs have been transported or brought. All prosecutions shall be commenced within eighteen months from the time the offense charged was committed.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VI, § 2, p. 433;

C.S.1929, § 37-602;

R.S.1943, § 37-602;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 229;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-602;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 292;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 85.